Georgia, session 2025_26, SB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Public
Service Commission, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"46-2-25.4.
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 46-3-11, no costs incurred by an
electric utility, including, but not limited to, costs associated with increased fuel
requirements, generation costs, and transmission costs that:
(1) Are related to the provision of electric services to commercial data centers; and
- 1 -

LC 55 0460S
(2) Would not have been incurred but for the electric demand of such commercial data
centers,
shall be included in any rates or charges approved or allowed to go into effect under Code
Section 46-2-25 or 46-2-26 unless such rates or charges are designed to recover such costs
solely from commercial data centers or are prorated based on electric demand.
(b) As used in this Code section, the term 'commercial data center' means a facility,
campus of facilities, or array of interconnected facilities in this state that is used by an
entity or other business enterprise to operate, manage, or maintain a computer, group of
computers, or other organized assembly of hardware and software for the primary purpose
of processing, storing, retrieving, or transmitting data and that has a peak demand of 100
megawatts or greater."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -